Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8220.01
Intermediate level rehabilitation center, defined.

Intermediate level rehabilitation center means a rehabilitation center which provides rehabilitative services to individuals with musculoskeletal trauma, peripheral nerve lesions, lower extremity amputations, and other diagnoses resulting in functional impairment in one or more functional areas, with moderate to severe impairment or complexity.

Laws 1997, LB 626, § 6;

R.S.1943, (2009), § 71-8206;

Laws 2015, LB46, § 6.